Hawaii statutes.
[§383-29.9] Partial unemployment; reporting
requirements. (a) An employer to whom a claimant for partial unemployment
is still attached shall submit verification of earnings and satisfy all low
earnings reporting requirements in subsection (b) and rules of the department
for each week that the claimant certifies for partial unemployment benefits.

(b) Low earnings reports shall be submitted as
follows:

(1) Whenever, during any weekly pay period in an
individual's benefit year, an individual has worked less than full-time hours for
the regular employer to which the individual is attached, and the individual's
earnings are less than the individual's current weekly benefit amount, the
individual's employer, upon request by the department shall:

(A) Enter the individual's name, social
security account number, gross earnings, week-ending date, and the reasons for
the individual's reduced workweek on a form provided or approved by the
department and return the form to the unemployment insurance office as instructed
within five working days after the notice of an individual's benefit amount has
been mailed to the employer as to all prior weeks for which benefits are
claimed. Thereafter, during the benefit year, the employer shall report within
five working days after the end of each week or weekly pay period for which the
low earnings reports are required; or

(B) Furnish the individual personally with the
information on a form provided or approved by the department and the individual
shall be responsible to submit the report to the unemployment insurance office
within five working days after the end of each week or weekly pay period or as
instructed by the department.

(2) If the employer or individual fails to submit the
low earnings report as prescribed in paragraph (1)(A) or (B) within the time
specified by the department, the department shall determine the individual's
eligibility for any week's benefits claimed based on the individual's
certification of employment and earnings.
[L 2009, c 170, pt of §2, §7; am L 2010, c 76, §3; am L 2011, c 165, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next